North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47. Probate and Registration.
Article 2. Registration.
§ 47-27.
Deeds of easements.

All persons, firms, or corporations now owning or hereafter acquiring any deed or agreement for rights-of-way and easements of any character whatsoever shall record such deeds and agreements in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the land affected is situated. Where such deeds and agreements may have been acquired, but no use has been made thereof, the person, firm, or corporation holding such instrument, or any assignment thereof, shall not be required to record them until within 90 days after the beginning of the use of the easements granted thereby. If after 90 days from the beginning of the easement granted by such deeds and agreements the person, firm, or corporation holding such deeds or agreements has not recorded the same in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the land affected is situated, then the grantor in the said deed or agreement may, after 10 days’ notice in writing served and returned by the sheriff or other officer of the county upon the said person, firm, or corporation holding such lease or agreement, file a copy of the said lease or agreement for registration in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the original should have been recorded, but such copy of the lease or agreement shall have attached thereto the written notice above referred to, showing the service and return of the sheriff or other officer. The registration of such copy shall have the same force and effect as the original would have had if recorded: Provided, said copy shall be duly probated before being registered.

Nothing in this section shall require the registration of the following classes of instruments or conveyances, to wit:

It shall not apply to any deed or instrument executed prior to January 1, 1910.

It shall not apply to any deed or instrument so defectively executed or witnessed that it cannot by law be admitted to probate or registration, provided that such deed or instrument was executed prior to the ratification of this section.

It shall not apply to decrees of a competent court awarding condemnation or confirming reports of commissioners, when such decrees are on record in such courts.

It shall not apply to local telephone companies, operating exclusively within the State, or to agreements about alleyways.

The failure of electric companies or power companies operating exclusively within this State or electric membership corporations, organized pursuant to Chapter 291 of the Public Laws of 1935 [G.S. 117-6 through 117-27], to record any deeds or agreements for rights-of-way acquired subsequent to 1935, shall not constitute any violation of any criminal law of the State of North Carolina.

No deed, agreement for right-of-way, or easement of any character shall be valid as against any creditor or purchaser for a valuable consideration but from the registration thereof within the county where the land affected thereby lies.

From and after July 1, 1959, the provisions of this section shall apply to require the Department of Transportation to record as herein provided any deeds of easement, or any other agreements granting or conveying an interest in land which are executed on or after July 1, 1959, in the same manner and to the same extent that individuals, firms or corporations are required to record such easements.

History.

1917, c. 148; 1919, c. 107; C.S., s. 3316; 1943, c. 750; 1959, c. 1244; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 34.

Local Modification.

Alleghany: C.S. 3316; Halifax: 1939, c. 45; Harnett and Lee: C.S. 3316; Martin: 1939, c. 45; Surry and Wilkes: C.S. 3316.

§ 47-28.
Powers of attorney.

Recording required for powers of attorney affecting real property:

Before any transfer of real property executed by an agent empowered by a power of attorney governed by Chapter 32C of the General Statutes, the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney shall be registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the principal is domiciled or where the real property lies. If the principal is not a resident of North Carolina, the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney may be recorded in any county in the State wherein the principal owns real property or has a significant business reason for registering in the county.

If the real property lies in more than one county or in a county other than where the principal is domiciled, the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney shall be registered in the office of the register of deeds in one of the counties, and the instrument of transfer shall refer to the recordation specifically by reference to the book, page, and county where recorded.

Any instrument subject to the provisions of

G.S. 47-17.2

, 47-18, or 47-20 and signed by an agent and recorded in a county other than the county where a power of attorney is recorded in this State shall include the recording information, including book, page, and county for the power of attorney.

The failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection shall not affect the sufficiency, validity, or enforceability of the instrument but shall constitute an infraction.

If the instrument of conveyance is recorded prior to the registration of the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney may be registered in the office of the register of deeds as provided in subsection (a) of this section thereafter provided that the agent was empowered at the time of the original conveyance. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, no conveyance shall be rendered invalid by the recordation of the power of attorney or a certified copy of the power of attorney after the instrument of conveyance, and the registration shall relate back to the date and time of registration of the instrument of conveyance.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall apply to all real property transfers utilizing an authority under any power of attorney whether made on or after April 1, 2013, and the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all real property transfers utilizing an authority under any power of attorney whether made before, on, or after April 1, 2013.

History.

Code, s. 1249; 1899, c. 235, s. 15; Rev., s. 987; C.S., s. 3317; 2013-204, s. 1.15; 2017-153, s. 2.2.

Cross References.

As to form for acknowledgment of instrument executed by attorney in fact, see

G.S. 47-43

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.15, effective June 26, 2013, rewrote this section, which formerly read: “Every power of attorney, wherever made or concerning whatsoever matter, may, on acknowledgment or proof of the same before any competent official, be registered in the county wherein the property or estate which it concerns is situate, if such power of attorney relate to the conveyance thereof; if it does not relate to the conveyance of any estate or property, then in the county in which the attorney resides or the business is to be transacted”.

Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.2, effective January 1, 2018, in subdivision (a)(1) substituted “agent” for “attorney-in-fact”, and substituted “Chapter 32C” for “Article 1, Article 2, or Article 2A of Chapter 32A”; and substituted “agent” for “attorney-in-fact” in subdivision (a)(3) and in subsection (b).

§ 47-29.
Recording of bankruptcy records.

A copy of the petition with the schedules omitted beginning a proceeding under the United States Bankruptcy Act, or of the decree of adjudication in such proceeding, or of the order approving the bond of the trustee appointed in such proceeding, shall be recorded in the office of any register of deeds in North Carolina, and it shall be the duty of the register of deeds, on request, to record the same. The register of deeds shall be entitled to the same fees for such registration as he is now entitled to for recording conveyances.

History.

1939, c. 254.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 344 (1939).

§ 47-29.1.
Recordation of environmental notices.

A permit for the disposal of waste on land shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 130A-301

.

(a1)

The disposal of land clearing and inert debris in a landfill with a disposal area of 1/2 acre or less pursuant to

G.S. 130A-301

.1 shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 130A-301.1

(c).

(a2)

A Notice of Open Dump shall be recorded as provided in G.S. 130A-301(f).

(a3)

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 1995, c. 502, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2001-357, s. 2, effective September 30, 2003.

(a4)

The disposal of on-site demolition debris from the decommissioning of manufacturing buildings, including electric generating stations, shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 130A-301.3

.

An inactive hazardous substance or waste disposal site shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 130A-310.8

.

A Notice of Brownfields Property shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 130A-310.35

.

A Notice of Oil or Hazardous Substance Discharge Site shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 143-215.85

A.

A Notice of Dry-Cleaning Solvent Remediation shall be recorded as provided in

G.S. 143-215.104

M.

A Notice of Contaminated Site shall be recorded as provided in G.S. 143B-279.10.

A Notice of Residual Petroleum shall be recorded as provided in G.S. 143B-279.11.

A land-use restriction that provides for the maintenance of stormwater best management practices or site consistency with approved stormwater project plans shall be recorded as provided in G.S. 143-214.7(c1).

History.

1995, c. 502, s. 2.1; 1997-330, s. 1; 2001-357, s. 2; 2001-384, s. 10; 2006-246, s. 16(a); 2013-55, s. 3; 2013-410, s. 16.3.

§ 47-30.
Plats and subdivisions; mapping requirements.

Size Requirements. — All land plats presented to the register of deeds for recording in the registry of a county in North Carolina after September 30, 1991, having an outside marginal size of either 18 inches by 24 inches, 21 inches by 30 inches, or 24 inches by 36 inches, and, for landscape format, having a minimum one and one-half inch border on the left side or, for portrait format, one and one-half inch border on the top side and a minimum one-half inch border on the other sides shall be deemed to meet the size requirements for recording under this section. Where size of land areas, or suitable scale to assure legibility require, plats may be placed on two or more sheets with appropriate match lines. Counties may specify either:

Only 18 inches by 24 inches;

A combination of 18 inches by 24 inches and 21 inches by 30 inches;

A combination of 18 inches by 24 inches and 24 inches by 36 inches; or

A combination of all three sizes.

Provided, that all registers of deeds where specific sizes other than the combination of all three sizes have been specified, shall be required to submit said size specifications to the North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds for inclusion on a master list of all such counties. The list shall be available in each register of deeds office by October 1, 1991. For purposes of this section, the terms “plat” and “map” are synonymous.

Plats to Be Reproducible. — Each plat presented for recording shall be a reproducible plat, either original ink on polyester film (mylar), or a reproduced drawing, transparent and archival (as defined by the American National Standards Institute), and submitted in this form. The recorded plat must be such that the public may obtain legible copies. A direct or photographic copy of each recorded plat shall be placed in the plat book or plat file maintained for that purpose and properly indexed for use. In those counties in which the register has made a security copy of the plat from which legible copies can be made, the original plat may be submitted in the form of black line on white paper instead of transparent and archival and may be returned to the person indicated on the plat.

Information Contained in Title of Plat. — The title of each plat shall contain the following information:

The property designation.

The name of the owner; provided, however, that the name of owner shall be shown for indexing purposes only and is not to be construed as title certification.

The location, to include county and State, and the township or city, if applicable.

The date or dates the survey was made.

The scale or scale ratio in words or figures and bar graph.

The name and address of surveyor preparing the plat, including the firm name and firm license number, if applicable.

The dates and descriptions of revisions made after original signing.

The information required pursuant to this subsection shall be listed prominently on the plat. Information listed in the notes contained on the plat does not satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

Certificate; Form. — There shall appear on each plat a certificate by the person under whose supervision the survey or plat was made, stating the reference source for the boundary information for the surveyed property shown on the plat, including recorded deed and plat references shown thereon. The ratio of precision or positional accuracy before any adjustments must be shown. Any lines on the plat that were not actually surveyed must be clearly indicated and a statement included revealing the source of information. Where a plat consists of more than one sheet, only one sheet must contain the certification and all other sheets must be signed and sealed. Multiple sheet plats shall be identified as a map set.The certificate required above shall include (i) the source of information for the survey, (ii) data indicating the ratio of precision or positional accuracy of the survey before adjustments, and (iii) the seal and signature pursuant to Chapter 89C of the General Statutes, and shall be in substantially the following form:“I, _______________ , certify that this plat was drawn under my supervision from an actual survey made under my supervision (deed description recorded in Book _______________ , page _______________ , etc.) (other); that the boundaries not surveyed are clearly indicated as drawn from information found in Book _______________ , page _______________ ; that the ratio of precision or positional accuracy as calculated is _______________ ; that this plat was prepared in accordance with

G.S. 47-30

as amended. Witness my original signature, license number and seal this _______________ day of _______________ , A.D., _______________ .Seal or Stamp _________ Professional Land Surveyor License Number”Nothing in this requirement shall prevent the recording of a map that was prepared in accordance with a previous version of

G.S. 47-30

as amended, properly signed, and notarized under the statutes applicable at the time of the signing of the map. However, it shall be the responsibility of the person presenting the map to prove that the map was so prepared. The presence of the personal signature and seal of a professional land surveyor shall constitute a certification that the map conforms to the standards of practice for land surveying in this State as defined in the rules of the North Carolina State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors.

Method of Computation. — An accurate method of computation shall be used to determine the acreage and either the ratio of precision or the positional accuracy shown on the plat. Area by estimation is not acceptable nor is area by planimeter, area by scale, or area copied from another source, except in the case of tracts containing inaccessible sections or areas. In such case the surveyor may make use of aerial photographs or other appropriate aids to determine the acreage of any inaccessible areas when the areas are bounded by natural and visible monuments. In such case the methods used must be stated on the plat and all accessible areas of the tract shall remain subject to all applicable standards of this section.

Plat to Contain Specific Information. — Every plat shall contain the following specific information:

An accurately positioned north arrow coordinated with any bearings shown on the plat. Indication shall be made as to whether the north index is true, magnetic, North Carolina grid (“NAD 83,” “NAD 27,” or other published horizontal datum), or is referenced to old deed or plat bearings. If the north index is magnetic or referenced to old deed or plat bearings, the date and the source (if known) the index was originally determined shall be clearly indicated. North Carolina grid reference shall include the horizontal datum and the realization reference.

The azimuth or course and distance of every property line surveyed shall be shown. Distances shall be in U.S. Survey feet or meters and decimals thereof. The number of decimal places shall be appropriate to the class of survey required.

All plat distances shall be by horizontal ground or horizontal grid measurements. All lines shown on the plat shall be correctly plotted to the scale shown. Enlargement of portions of a plat are acceptable in the interest of clarity, where shown as inserts. Where the North Carolina grid system is used the combined grid factor shall be shown on the face of the plat. If grid distances are used, it must be indicated on the plat.

Where a boundary is formed by a curved line, the following data must be given: actual survey data from the point of curvature to the point of tangency shall be shown as standard curve data, or as a traverse of bearings and distances around the curve. If standard curve data is used the bearing and distance of the long chord (from point of curvature to point of tangency) must be shown on the plat.

Where a subdivision of land is set out on the plat, all streets and lots shall be accurately plotted with dimension lines indicating widths and all other information pertinent to reestablishing all lines in the field. This shall include bearings and distances sufficient to form a continuous closure of the entire perimeter.

All corners which are marked by monument or natural object shall be so identified on all plats, and where practical all corners of adjacent owners along the boundary lines of the subject tract which are marked by monument or natural object shall be shown.

The names of adjacent landowners, or lot, block, parcel, subdivision name designations or other legal reference, where applicable, shall be shown where they could be determined by the surveyor.

All visible and apparent rights-of-way, watercourses, utilities, roadways, and other such improvements shall be accurately located where crossing or forming any boundary line of the property shown. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to modify the notification responsibility of persons engaged in excavation or demolition pursuant to

G.S. 87-122

.

Where the plat is the result of a survey, one or more corners shall be labeled with coordinates on the plat, shown as “X” (easting) and “Y” (northing) coordinates, traceable to a published geodetic datum or the North Carolina State Plane Coordinate System, or both. The plat should include, at a minimum, the referenced horizontal datum and realization (i.e., “NAD 83 (2011)”) as well as the data or method used to establish those coordinates, or both. If the bearings shown on the map are not referenced to the same datum as the grid coordinates shown, then either (i) the coordinates of a second point shall be labeled and the two labeled points tied together by a single azimuth or course and distance or (ii) the plat shall include, in written and graphical form, the conversion from plat bearings to reference bearings. Control monuments within a previously recorded subdivision may be used in lieu of grid control. In the interest of consistency with previously recorded plats, existing bearing control may be used where practical. Where no horizontal control monument of any United States or State agency survey system, such as the North Carolina Geodetic Survey, is located within 2,000 feet of the subject property, ties to other appropriate natural monuments or landmarks may be used in lieu of grid coordinates. In all cases, the tie lines shall be sufficient to reproduce the subject lands from the control or reference points used.

A vicinity map (location map) and legend shall appear on the plat.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this section, it is the duty of the surveyor, by a certificate on the face of the plat, to certify to one of the following:

That the survey creates a subdivision of land within the area of a county or municipality that has an ordinance that regulates parcels of land.

That the survey is located in a portion of a county or municipality that is unregulated as to an ordinance that regulates parcels of land.

Any one of the following:

That the survey is of an existing parcel or parcels of land or one or more existing easements and does not create a new street or change an existing street. For the purposes of this subsection, an “existing parcel” or “existing easement” is an area of land described in a single, legal description or legally recorded subdivision that has been or may be legally conveyed to a new owner by deed in its existing configuration.

That the survey is of an existing feature, such as a building or other structure, or natural feature, such as a watercourse.

That the survey is a control survey. For the purposes of this subsection, a “control survey” is a survey that provides horizontal or vertical position data for support or control of other surveys or for mapping. A control survey, by itself, cannot be used to define or convey rights or ownership.

That the survey is of a proposed easement for a public utility as defined in

G.S. 62-3

.

That the survey is of another category, such as the recombination of existing parcels, a court-ordered survey, or other exemption or exception to the definition of subdivision.

That the information available to the surveyor is such that the surveyor is unable to make a determination to the best of the surveyor’s professional ability as to provisions contained in (a) through (d) above.

If the plat contains the certificate of a surveyor as stated in sub-subdivisions b. or c. of this subdivision, nothing shall prevent the recordation of the plat if all other provisions have been met. However, if the plat contains the certificate of a surveyor as stated in sub-subdivisions a., d., or e. of this subdivision, then the plat shall have, in addition to said surveyor’s certificate, a certification of approval, or no approval required, as may be required by local ordinance from the appropriate government authority and the county review officer as provided in

G.S. 47-30.2

before the plat is presented for recordation. The signing and sealing of the certification as required in subsection (d) of this section shall satisfy the certification requirement contained in this subsection.

Recording of Plat. — In certifying a plat for recording pursuant to

G.S. 47-30.2

, the Review Officer shall not be responsible for reviewing or certifying as to any of the following requirements of this section:

Subsection (b) of this section as to archival.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-309, s. 2.

Subsection (e) of this section.

Subdivisions (1) through (10) of subsection (f) of this section.

A plat, when certified pursuant to

G.S. 47-30.2

and presented for recording, shall be recorded in the plat book or plat file and when so recorded shall be duly indexed. Reference in any instrument hereafter executed to the record of any plat herein authorized shall have the same effect as if the description of the lands as indicated on the record of the plat were set out in the instrument.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the filing of any plat prepared by a professional land surveyor but not recorded prior to the death of the professional land surveyor. However, it is the responsibility of the person presenting the map to the Review Officer pursuant to

G.S. 47-30.2

to prove that the plat was so prepared. For preservation these plats may be filed without signature, notary acknowledgement or probate, in a special plat file.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to invalidate any instrument or the title thereby conveyed making reference to any recorded plat.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to boundary plats of State lines, county lines, areas annexed by municipalities, nor to plats of municipal boundaries, whether or not required by law to be recorded.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all counties in North Carolina.

This section does not apply to the registration of highway right-of-way plans provided for in G.S. 136-19.4 or G.S. 136-89.184.

Maps attached to deeds or other instruments and submitted for recording in that form must be no larger than 81/2 inches by 14 inches and comply with either this subsection or subsection (n) of this section. A map submitted for recording pursuant to this subsection shall conform to one the following standards:

An original map that meets the requirements of subsections (c) through (f) of this section and that bears the signature of a professional land surveyor and the surveyor’s seal as approved by the State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors.

A copy of a previously recorded map that is certified by the custodian of the public record to be a true and accurate copy of the map.

A map that does not meet the requirements of subsection (m) of this section may be attached to a deed or other instrument submitted for recording in that form for illustrative purposes only if it meets both of the following requirements:

It is no larger than 81/2 inches by 14 inches.

It is conspicuously labelled, “THIS MAP MAY NOT BE A CERTIFIED SURVEY AND HAS NOT BEEN REVIEWED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT AGENCY FOR COMPLIANCE WITH ANY APPLICABLE LAND DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS AND HAS NOT BEEN REVIEWED FOR COMPLIANCE WITH RECORDING REQUIREMENTS FOR PLATS.”

The requirements of this section regarding plat size, reproducible form, and evidence of required certifications shall be met with respect to a plat that is an “electronic document,” as that term is defined in G.S. 47-16.2(3), if all of the following conditions have been met:

The register of deeds has authorized the submitter to electronically register the electronic document.

The plat is submitted by a United States federal or a state governmental unit or instrumentality or a trusted submitter. For purposes of this subsection, “a trusted submitter” means a person or entity that has entered into a memorandum of understanding regarding electronic recording with the register of deeds in the county in which the electronic document is to be submitted.

Evidence of required certifications appear on the digitized image of the document as it will appear on the public record.

With respect to a plat submitted by a trusted submitter, the digitized image of the document as it will appear on the public record contains the submitter’s name in the following completed statement on the first page of the document image: “Submitted electronically by _______________ (submitter’s name) in compliance with North Carolina statutes governing recordable documents and the terms of the submitter agreement with the _______________ (insert county name) County Register of Deeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the digitized image of the plat conforms to all other applicable laws and rules that prescribe recordation.

History.

1911, c. 55, s. 2; C.S., s. 3318; 1923, c. 105; 1935, c. 219; 1941, c. 249; 1953, c. 47, s. 1; 1959, c. 1235, ss. 1, 3A, 3.1; 1961, cc. 7, 111, 164, 199, 252, 660, 687, 932, 1122; 1963, c. 71, ss. 1, 2; cc. 180, 236; c. 361, s. 1; c. 403; 1965, c. 139, s. 1; 1967, c. 228, s. 2; c. 394; 1971, c. 658; 1973, cc. 76, 848, 1171; c. 1262, s. 86; 1975, c. 192; c. 200, s. 1; 1977, c. 50, s. 1; c. 221, s. 1; c. 305, s. 2; c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 330, s. 1; 1981, c. 138, s. 1; c. 140, s. 1; c. 479; 1983, c. 473; 1987, c. 747, s. 20; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(6); 1991, c. 268, s. 3; 1993, c. 119, ss. 1, 2; 1997-309, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1998-228, ss. 11, 12; 1999-456, s. 59; 2000-140, s. 93.1(b); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2008-225, s. 9; 2010-180, s. 1; 2011-246, s. 7; 2012-142, s. 12.4(f); 2017-27, s. 1; 2019-35, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Ashe: 1979, c. 330, ss. 2, 3; Avery: 1973, c. 1050, ss. 1, 2; Cabarrus: 2002-115, s. 2; Davie, as to subsection (f)(3): 1961, c. 609; Durham: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Harnett: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Mecklinburg: 2002-115, s. 2; Moore: 2003-326, s. 2.1; New Hanover: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Onslow: 1977, c. 305, s. 1; Randolph: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Wilson: 1957, c. 1137.

Cross References.

As to validation of registration of plats prior to the 1953 amendment, see

G.S. 47-108.10

.

§ 47-30.1.
Plats and subdivisions; alternative requirements.

In a county to which the provisions of

G.S. 47-30

do not apply, any person, firm or corporation owning land may have a plat thereof recorded in the office of the register of deeds if such land or any part thereof is situated in the county, upon proof upon oath by the surveyor making such plat or under whose supervision such plat was made that the same is in all respects correct according to the best of his knowledge and belief and was prepared from an actual survey by him made, or made under his supervision, giving the date of such survey, or if the surveyor making such plat is dead, or where land has been sold and conveyed according to an unrecorded plat, upon the oath of a duly licensed surveyor that said map is in all respects correct according to the best of his knowledge and belief and that the same was actually and fully checked and verified by him, giving the date on which the same was verified and checked.

History.

1961, c. 534, s. 1; c. 985.

Local Modification.

Avery: 1973, c. 1050; Yadkin: 1977, c. 480.

§ 47-30.2.
Review Officer.

The board of commissioners of each county shall, by resolution, designate by name one or more persons experienced in mapping or land records management as a Review Officer to review each map and plat required to be submitted for review before the map or plat is presented to the register of deeds for recording. Each person designated a Review Officer shall, if reasonably feasible, be certified as a property mapper pursuant to

G.S. 147-54.4

. A resolution designating a Review Officer shall be recorded in the county registry and indexed on the grantor index in the name of the Review Officer.

The Review Officer shall review expeditiously each map or plat required to be submitted to the Officer before the map or plat is presented to the register of deeds for recording. The Review Officer shall certify the map or plat if it complies with all statutory requirements for recording.Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the register of deeds shall not accept for recording any map or plat required to be submitted to the Review Officer unless the map or plat has the certification of the Review Officer affixed to it. A certification shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

A map or plat must be presented to the Review Officer unless one or more of the following conditions are applicable:

The certificate required by

G.S. 47-30

(f)(11) shows that the map or plat is a survey within the meaning of

G.S. 47-30

(f)(11)b. or c.

The map or plat is exempt from the requirements of G.S. 47-30 pursuant to G.S. 47-30(j) or (l).

The map is an attachment that is being recorded pursuant to G.S. 47-30(n).

State of North Carolina County of I, , Review Officer of County, certify that the map or plat to which this certification is affixed meets all statutory requirements for recording. Review Officer Date

History.

1997-309, s. 3; 1998-228, s. 13.

§ 47-31.
Certified copies may be registered; used as evidence.

A duly certified copy of any deed or writing required or allowed to be registered may be registered in any county. The register of deeds may rely on the record keeper’s certification on a presented document that the document is a certified copy and is not required to further verify the proof or acknowledgement otherwise required by

G.S. 47-14

or to determine whether the document has been changed or altered after it was certified. The registered or duly certified copy of any deed or writing that has been registered in the county where the land is situate may be given in evidence in any court of the State.

Instruments registered pursuant to this section prior to July 6, 1993 that were not further certified pursuant to

G.S. 47-14

at the time of registration are hereby validated.

History.

1858-9, c. 18, s. 2; Code, s. 1253; Rev., s. 988; C. S., s. 3319; 1993, c. 288, ss. 2, 3; 2008-194, s. 7(b).

Cross References.

As to certified copies of registered instruments as evidence, see

G.S. 8-18

.

As to court records as proof of destroyed instruments, see

G.S. 98-12

and 98-13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-194, s. 7(b), effective August 8, 2008, substituted “The register of deeds may rely on the record keeper’s certification on a presented document that the document is a certified copy and is not required to further verify the proof or acknowledgement otherwise required by

G.S. 47-14

or to determine whether the document has been changed or altered after it was certified. The” for “without further certification pursuant to

G.S. 47-14

; and the” in
subsection (a).

§ 47-32.
Photographic copies of plats, etc.

After January 1, 1960, in all special proceedings in which a map shall be filed as a part of the papers, such map shall meet the specifications required for recording of maps in the office of the register of deeds, and the clerk of superior court may certify a copy thereof to the register of deeds of the county in which said lands lie for recording in the Map Book provided for that purpose; and the clerk of superior court may have a photographic copy of said map made on a sheet of the same size as the leaves in the book in which the special proceeding is recorded, and when made, may place said photographic copy in said book at the end of the report of the commissioner or other document referring to said map.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following counties: Alexander, Alleghany, Ashe, Beaufort, Camden, Clay, Franklin, Granville, Greene, Harnett, Hertford, Hoke, Hyde, Jackson, Jones, Lee, Lincoln, Madison, Martin, Northampton, Pamlico, Pasquotank, Pender, Person, Pitt, Richmond, Robeson, Rockingham, Sampson, Scotland, Surry, Swain, Vance, Warren, Washington, Watauga and Yadkin.

History.

1931, c. 171; 1959, c. 1235, ss. 2, 3A, 3.1; 1961, cc. 7, 111, 164, 252, 697, 932, 1122; 1963, c. 71, s. 3; c. 236; c. 361, s. 2; 1965, c. 139, s. 2; 1971, c. 1185, s. 13; 1977, c. 111; c. 221, s. 2; 1981, c. 138, s. 1; c. 140, s. 1; 1985, c. 32, s. 1.

§ 47-32.1.
Photostatic copies of plats, etc.; alternative provisions.

In a county to which the provisions of

G.S. 47-32

do not apply, the following alternative provisions shall govern photostatic copies of plats filed in special proceedings:

In all special proceedings in which a plat, map or blueprint shall be filed as a part of the papers, the clerk of the superior court may have a photostatic copy of said plat, map or blueprint made on a sheet of the same size as the leaves in the book in which the special proceeding is recorded, and when made, shall place said photostatic copy in said book at the end of the report of the commissioners or other document referring to said plat, map or blueprint.

History.

1961, c. 535, s. 1; 1971, c. 1185, s. 14.

§ 47-32.2.
Violation of G.S. 47-30 or G.S. 47-32 a misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation willfully violating the provisions of

G.S. 47-30

or

G.S. 47-32

shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject only to a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following counties: Alexander, Alleghany, Ashe, Beaufort, Camden, Clay, Franklin, Granville, Greene, Harnett, Hertford, Hoke, Hyde, Jackson, Jones, Lee, Lincoln, Madison, Martin, Northampton, Pamlico, Pasquotank, Pender, Person, Pitt, Richmond, Robeson, Rockingham, Sampson, Scotland, Surry, Swain, Vance, Warren, Washington, Watauga and Yadkin.

History.

1959, c. 1235, ss. 3, 3A, 3.1; 1961, cc. 7, 111, 164, 252; c. 535, s. 1; cc. 687, 932, 1122; 1963, c. 236; c. 361, s. 3; 1965, c. 139, s. 3; 1977, c. 110; c. 221, s. 3; 1981, c. 138, s. 1; c. 140, s. 1; 1985, c. 32, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 408; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 47-33.
Certified copies of deeds made by alien property custodian may be registered.

Any copy of a deed made, or purporting to be made, by the United States alien property custodian duly certified pursuant to title twenty-eight, section six hundred sixty-one of United States Code by the department of justice of the United States, with its official seal impressed thereon, when the said certified copy reveals the fact that the execution of the original was acknowledged by the alien property custodian before a notary public of the District of Columbia, and that the official seal of the alien property custodian by recital was affixed or impressed on the original, and further reveals it to have been approved, as to form, by general counsel, and the copy also shows that the original was signed and approved by the acting chief, division of trusts, and was witnessed by two witnesses, shall, when presented to the register of deeds of any county wherein the land described therein purports to be situate, be recorded by the register of deeds of such county without other or further proof of the execution and/or delivery of the original thereof, and the same when so recorded shall be indexed and cross-indexed by the register of deeds as are deeds made by individuals upon the payment of the usual and lawful fees for the registration thereof.

History.

1937, c. 5, s. 1.

§ 47-34.
Certified copies of deeds made by alien property custodian admissible in evidence.

The record of all such recorded copies of such instruments authorized in

G.S. 47-33

shall be received in evidence in all the courts of this State and the courts of the United States in the trial of any cause pending therein, the same as though and with like effect as if the original thereof had been probated and recorded as required by the law of North Carolina, and the record in the office of register of deeds of such recorded copy of such an instrument shall be presumptive evidence that the original of said copy was executed and delivered to the vendee, or vendees therein named, and that the original thereof has been lost or unintentionally destroyed without registration, and in the absence of legal proof to the contrary said so registered copy shall be conclusive evidence that the United States alien property custodian conveyed the lands and premises described in said registered copy to the vendees therein named, as said copy reveals, and title to such land shall pass by such recorded instrument.

History.

1937, c. 5, s. 2.

§ 47-35.
Register to fill in deeds on blank forms with lines.

Registers of deeds shall, in registering deeds and other instruments, where printed skeletons or forms are used by the register, fill all spaces left blank in such skeletons or forms by drawing or stamping a line or lines in ink through such blank spaces.

History.

1911, c. 6, s. 1; C.S., s. 3320.